Florida, session 2026, SB426.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 18 19 Section 1.âSection 256.18, Florida Statutes, is created to 20 read: 21 256.18âGovernmental entities; display of flags.â 22 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âgovernmental entityâ 23 means a state, county, municipality, special district, or other 24 political subdivision, whether executive, judicial, or 25 legislative, including, but not limited to, a department, 26 division, board, bureau, commission, authority, or district, or 27 an agency thereof, or a public school, Florida College System 28 institution, state university, or associated board. 29 (2)(a)âA governmental entity may not: 30 1.âDisplay any flag on real property other than a flag 31 listed in subsection (3). 32 2.âPlace or cause to be placed a flag authorized to be 33 displayed under subsection (3) which contains or depicts any 34 word, figure, mark, picture, design, drawing, symbol, or 35 advertisement of any nature which represents political 36 partisanship, political ideology, race, gender, or sexual 37 orientation. 38 (b)âA governmental entity that violates this subsection is 39 liable for a civil fine in the amount of $500 per day. Proceeds 40 from fines collected by the Department of State shall be 41 deposited into the General Revenue Fund. 42 (3)âA governmental entity may display on real property: 43 (a)âThe flag of the United States. 44 (b)âThe state flag. 45 (c)âThe flag of another state or another country. 46 (d)âThe flag of a city, county, municipality, or other 47 political subdivision of this state. 48 (e)âThe flag of a branch of the United States Armed Forces. 49 (f)âA POW-MIA flag pursuant to this chapter. 50 (g)âThe flag of an Indian tribe recognized by the United 51 States. 52 (h)âThe official flag of a public school, Florida College 53 System institution, or state university. 54 (i)âA flag of historical significance to the government of 55 the United States or this state. 56 (j)âThe official flag of the United States Paralympic 57 Committee, the International Olympic Committee, or the 58 International Paralympic Committee. 59 (k)âThe Olympic flag or Paralympic flag representing games 60 that have occurred or will occur in this state. 61 (l)âThe flag of any sporting organization that is hosting, 62 has hosted, or will host a sporting event in this state. 63 (4)âA governmental entity that displays the United States 64 flag must display the flag in a prominent position that is 65 superior to any other flag on display. 66 Section 2.âSection 256.19, Florida Statutes, is created to 67 read: 68 256.19âLocal government flags; prohibited acts.â 69 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âlocal governmentâ 70 means a city, county, municipality, or other political 71 subdivision of this state. 72 (2)âA local government may not adopt an ordinance or 73 regulation that authorizes the flag of the local government to 74 contain or depict any word, figure, mark, picture, design, 75 drawing, symbol, or advertisement of any nature which represents 76 political partisanship, political ideology, race, gender, or 77 sexual orientation. 78 (3)âAny existing or future ordinance or regulation adopted 79 by a local government which is in conflict with subsection (2) 80 is void. 81 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.